Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. There is hereby appropriated to the County Improvements for
Roads and Bridges Fund created pursuant to Section 507 of Title 69
of the Oklahoma Statutes from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Twenty-five Million Dollars
($25,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
Req. No. 12249 Page 1

reco nstruction of county bridges on the portion of the county
highway system defined as major collector routes in accordance with
the provisions of Section 654 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
Projects proposed by the counties will be submitted to, evaluated,
and prioritized by the Department of Transportation in accordance
with the criteria provided for in this subsection.
B. Bridges proposed for reconstruction will be generally
evaluated based on the state of project innovation, readiness,
structural adequacy, safety, serviceability, functional
obsolescence, essentiality for public use, and special reductions
for characteristics such as detour length, traffic safety features,
and current school bus routes.
C. The direct or indirect financial participation by the county
proposing the project shall be an additional selection factor for
proposed projects, along with the objective distribution of funding.
D. Any approved projects awarded by the Transportation
Commission shall be contracted as provided by law.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. There is hereby appropriated to the County Improvements for
Roads and Bridges Fund created pursuant to Section 507 of Title 69
of the Oklahoma Statutes from any monies not otherwise appropriated
from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Twenty-five Million Dollars
Req. No. 12249 Page 2

($25 ,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary for the
reconstruction of county roads on the portion of the county highway
system defined as major collector routes in accordance with the
provisions of Section 654 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
Projects proposed by the counties will be submitted to, evaluated,
and prioritized by the Department of Transportation in accordance
with the criteria provided for in this subsection.
B. Roads proposed for reconstruction will be generally
evaluated based on the state of project innovation, readiness, the
state of operation and repair of any bridge infrastructure within
the proposed project limits, drainage characteristics, subgrade and
pavement condition, safety, serviceability, essentiality for public
use, percentage of truck traffic, and special reductions for
characteristics such as detour length, traffic safety features, and
current school bus routes.
C. The direct or indirect financial participation by the county
proposing the project shall be an additional selection factor for
proposed projects, along with the objective distribution of funding.
D. Any approved projects awarded by the Transportation
Commission shall be contracted as provided by law.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 12249 Page 3

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12249 JBH 01/23/25




















Req. No. 12249 Page 4